Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7440
Pedigree, defined.

Pedigree means a written or electronic documentation of every transfer of a prescription drug as provided in sections 71-7455 and 71-7456.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 14.